Maine, session 132, LD825.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 38 MRSA §579-A is enacted to read:
§579-A. Geoengineering prohibited
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Excessive electromagnetic, radio frequency or microwave radiation emissions"
means:
(1) With respect to electromagnetic emissions:
(a) A low-frequency alternating current electric field in excess of one volt per
meter;
(b) A magnetic field in excess of one milligauss;
(c) So-called dirty electricity caused by transients in electrical wiring that must
be filtered for safety;
(d) Ionizing radiation in excess of 0.02 millisievert per hour;
(e) A laser or other light with harmful effects; or
(f) Any vibration, noise, sound amplification by stimulated emissions
radiation, sonic weapon or other physical agent exceeding established
guidelines or standards; and
(2) With respect to radio frequency or microwave radiation emissions, emissions
of a signal strength in excess of -85 decibel-milliwatt for any frequency or channel
band specified by a transmitting entity's transmission license.
B. "Geoengineering" means any intentional, large-scale intervention in Earth's natural
systems, including, but not limited to, stratospheric aerosol injection; weather
modification techniques; excessive electromagnetic, radio frequency or microwave
radiation emissions; harmful nuclear, biological or chemical emissions; or other
polluting atmospheric activity.
C. "Harmful nuclear, biological or chemical emissions" means any nuclear, biological
or chemical emission that is xenobiotic and would otherwise not exist in the natural
environment or that is otherwise found at xenobiotic levels or levels beyond the limit
allowed under state or federal law.
D. "Solar radiation management" means any technique designed to reflect a portion of
the sun's radiation back into space.
E. "Stratospheric aerosol injection" means the release of reflective sulfate or other
aerosol particles into the stratosphere by high-altitude planes or blimps, tethered
balloons, artillery or other means for the purpose of solar radiation management.
F. "Weather modification technique" means any technique designed to alter or attempt
to alter Earth's natural weather patterns, including, but not limited to, cloud seeding.
2. Prohibition. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a person may
not engage in any activity that constitutes or involves geoengineering.
Page 1 - 132LR1237(01)

3. Enforcement; investigations; violations. The department shall enforce the
prohibition in this section. If the department discovers or is otherwise made aware of an
activity that may constitute or involve geoengineering, the department shall immediately
initiate appropriate investigative measures to determine whether a violation of this section
is occurring or has occurred and shall issue to any person engaging in the activity a notice
directing the person to cease all such activity that may be occurring in violation of this
section.
Notwithstanding section 349, Title 17-A, section 1704, subsection 3 or any other provision
of law to the contrary, a person that violates this section commits a Class C crime and is
subject to a fine of $500,000 for each day the violation continues and any other applicable
penalties under this Title or other provision of law or rule.
4. Activities involving Federal Government or other state or country. If the
department determines that an activity that constitutes or involves geoengineering
occurring or that had occurred within the State involves, directly or indirectly, the Federal
Government, another state or another country, the department shall issue to the Federal
Government or other state or country a notice that:
A. The activity is prohibited by law from occurring in or above the State; and
B. The Federal Government or other state or country is prohibited from engaging in
any future atmospheric activities in or above the State, regardless of whether such
activities involve or constitute geoengineering.
5. Reporting of violations. The department shall post on its publicly accessible
website information regarding the prohibition under this section and encouraging the public
to monitor, measure, document and report to the department incidents that may constitute
or involve geoengineering. Upon receipt of any such report, the department shall
immediately initiate appropriate investigative measures to determine whether a violation
of this section is occurring or has occurred.